Hawaii statutes.
[§201-80] Pacific international space
center for exploration systems; reporting requirement. The Pacific
international space center for exploration systems shall submit, no later than
September 1 of each year, an annual report to the legislature that includes:

(1) An updated business plan regarding the aerospace
technology research and development park project;

(2) Details on any progress made toward the
development of a world-class space center in Hawaii;

(3) The development of technologies and any concomitant
effect on the level of resource imports into the State;

(4) The status of all working relationships with
educational and research institutions and federal agencies;

(5) Details on any progress made toward the
development of a robotic operator training and certification program;

(6) The level of private sector investment in
aerospace and related industries, including the number and nature of any
partnerships with private industry to facilitate state-based manufacturing and
operations related to green energy technology;

(7) The status of the memorandum of understanding
with Hawaii Techworks and the east Hawaii community development corporation
regarding the cultivation of a skilled local workforce to support planned
manufacturing operations; and

(8) A detailed statement of assets, liabilities,
revenues, and expenses for each fiscal year ending June 30. [L 2013, c 273, §2]

Previous
Vol04_Ch0201-0257
Next